Utah statutes.
23-30-104.   Rulemaking authority, coordination, and administration for predator control.

(1)  The division may make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to establish programs to accomplish targeted predator control or general predator control, including programs that offer incentives or compensation to participants who remove a predatory animal that is detrimental to mule deer production.

(2)  The division shall:

(a)  administer a program established under Subsection (1);

(b)  coordinate with federal, state, and local governments, and private persons to accomplish the purposes of this chapter; and

(c)  coordinate with the Department of Agriculture and Food and the Agriculture and Wildlife Damage Prevention Board created in Section 4-23-4 to:

(i)  minimize unnecessary duplication of predator control efforts; and

(ii)  prevent interference between predator control programs administered under Title 4, Chapter 23, Agricultural and Wildlife Damage Prevention Act, and this chapter.

(3)  The division may:

(a)  contract with a vendor that offers targeted predator control services; and

(b)  prepare and distribute educational and training materials related to mule deer protection.

